src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V0_TÄIʹDDED !!= * @CODE@ täiʹdded:täidd

! seek parallell in MEINNAD
! FORMS
! (1) +V+Inf: täiʹdded
!   Ind.Prs.Pl1-Pl2, Ind.Prt.ConNeg
!   Imprt.Pl1-Pl2-Pl3, ActEss, Actio, PrsPrc, PrfPrc
! (2) +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: täidd
! (3) +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: täiʹdde
! (4) +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: taiʹdde
!   Ind.Prt.Sg1-Sg2-4
! (5) +V+Imprt+Sg2: vueiʹn
!   Ind.Prs.Sg1-Sg2-4-ConNeg
!   Ind.Prt.Sg3-Pl1-Pl2
!   Imprt.2.ConNeg
!   VAbe, GerTemp, GerInstr
!   Cond-Pot
! (6) +V+Pot+Sg3: taaiʹdež
! (7) +V+Imprt+Sg3: ???tääidas
! (8) +V+Imprt+ConNegII: ???taiddu
!    Pass.PrfPrc
! täiʹdded:täidd
! Stem is Strong
! Diphthong
! Vowel raising
! NEEDS WORK
!(son täidd) ??
:%^PAL VSUF-INF_ED ; !1
: VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED ; !2
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^PAL%>e K ; !3
:%^VOWRaise%^PAL%> VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ED ; !4
:%^XYY2XY VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED ; !5
:%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^XYY2XY%> VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ; !6 vueiʹnet
:%^XYY2XY%> VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ; !7
+Imprt+Sg3:%^XYY2XY%>as K ; !7
:%^VOWRaise VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED ; !8

LEXICON V_CEÄʹLǨǨED !!= * @CODE@ ceäʹlǩǩed:ceälkk
+V: V0_CEÄʹLǨǨED ;
LEXICON IV_CEÄʹLǨǨED !!= * @CODE@ ceäʹlǩǩed:ceälkk
+V+IV: V0_CEÄʹLǨǨED ;
LEXICON TV_CEÄʹLǨǨED !!= * @CODE@ ceäʹlǩǩed:ceälkk
+V+TV: V0_CEÄʹLǨǨED ;
LEXICON V0_CEÄʹLǨǨED !!= * @CODE@ ceäʹlǩǩed:ceälkk

! FORMS

!!
:%^PAL VSUF-INF_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (1) +V+Inf: ceäʹlǩǩed
!! V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2, Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
!! Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc

!!
: VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (2) +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ceälkk
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3, Ind.Prt.ConNeg, PrfPrc

!!
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^PAL%>e K ; !!= * @CODE@ (3) +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ceäʹlǩǩe
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3

!!
:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%> VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (4) +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: cieʹlǩǩe
!!  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

!!
:%^VOWRaise%^PALẸ%^PAL%^XYY2XY VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (5) +V+Imprt+Sg2: ciẹʹlǩ
!! Imprt+Sg2, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+Sg4, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr

!!
:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^XYY2XY%> VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (6) +V+Pot+Sg3: cieʹlǩi
!! Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot,

!!
:%^XYY2XY%> VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (7) +V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ceälkam
!! Ind+Prs+Sg1, Ind+Prs+Sg2, Cond,  Imprt+Sg3

!!
:%^VOWRaise VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (8) +V+Imprt+ConNegII: ciâlkku
!! Imprt+ConNeg, Pass+PrfPrc

!!
: VSUF-IMPRT-PL3_ED ;  !!= * @CODE@ +V+Imprt+Pl3 ceälkkaz
!! Imprt+Pl3

!! Allegro (10)
+Der/škueʹtted:%^PAL%^XYY2XY»škuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;

LEXICON V_MEÄʹTTED !!= * @CODE@ meäʹtted:meätt
+V: V0_MEÄʹTTED ;
LEXICON IV_MEÄʹTTED !!= * @CODE@ meäʹtted:meätt
+V+IV: V0_MEÄʹTTED ;
LEXICON TV_MEÄʹTTED !!= * @CODE@ meäʹtted:meätt
+V+TV: V0_MEÄʹTTED ;
LEXICON V0_MEÄʹTTED !!= * @CODE@ meäʹtted:meätt

! FORMS
! (1) +V+Inf: meäʹtted
!   Ind.Prs.Pl1-Pl2, Ind.Prt.ConNeg
!   Imprt.Pl1-Pl2-Pl3, ActEss, Actio, PrsPrc, PrfPrc
! (2) +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: meätt
! (3) +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: meäʹtˈte
! (4) +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: mieʹtˈte
!   Ind.Prt.Sg1-Sg2-4
! (5) +V+Imprt+Sg2: mieʹđ
!   Ind.Prs.Sg1-Sg2-4-ConNeg
!   Ind.Prt.Sg3-Pl1-Pl2
!   Imprt.2.ConNeg
!   VAbe, GerTemp, GerInstr
!   Cond-Pot
! (6) +V+Pot+Sg3: mieʹđež
! (7) +V+Imprt+Sg3: meättas
! (8) +V+Imprt+ConNegII: miâtˈtu
!    Pass.PrfPrc
! meäʹtted:meätt
:%^PAL VSUF-INF_ED ; !1
: VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED ; !2 meätt
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^PAL%>e K ; !3
:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%> VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ED ; !4
:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^XYY2XY%> VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ; !5
:%^XYY2XY%> VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ; !5 ?2 ?7
:%^XYY2XY VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED ;
+Pot+Sg3:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^XYY2XY%>ež   K ; !6
+Imprt+Sg3:%^XYY2XY%>as K ; !7
: VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED ; !8

+Der/škueʹtted:%^PAL%^XYY2XY»škuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;

LEXICON V_MÄʹHSSED !!= * @CODE@ mäʹhssed:mähss
+V: V0_MÄʹHSSED ;
LEXICON IV_MÄʹHSSED !!= * @CODE@ mäʹhssed:mähss
+V+IV: V0_MÄʹHSSED ;
LEXICON TV_MÄʹHSSED !!= * @CODE@ mäʹhssed:mähss
+V+TV: V0_MÄʹHSSED ;
LEXICON V0_MÄʹHSSED !!= * @CODE@ mäʹhssed:mähss

! FORMS
! (1) +V+Inf: mäʹhssed
!   Ind.Prs.Pl1-Pl2, Ind.Prt.ConNeg
!   Imprt.Pl1-Pl2-Pl3, ActEss, Actio, PrsPrc, PrfPrc
! (2) +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: mähss
! (3) +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: mäʹhsse
! (4) +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: maʹhsse
!   Ind.Prt.Sg1-Sg2-4
! (5) +V+Imprt+Sg2: maauʹs
!   Ind.Prs.Sg1-Sg2-4-ConNeg
!   Ind.Prt.Sg3-Pl1-Pl2
!   Imprt.2.ConNeg
!   VAbe, GerTemp, GerInstr
!   Cond-Pot
! (6) +V+Pot+Sg3: maauʹsež
! (7) +V+Imprt+Sg3: määusas
! (8) +V+Imprt+ConNegII: mahssu
!    Pass.PrfPrc
! mäʹhssed:mähss
:%^PAL VSUF-INF_ED ; !1
: VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED ; !2 mähss
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^PAL%>e K ; !3
:%^VOWRaise%^PAL%> VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ED ; !4
:%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^XYY2VY%> VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ; !5
:%^XYY2VY%> VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ; !5 ?2 ?7
:%^XYY2VY VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED ;
+Pot+Sg3:%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^XYY2VY%>ež   K ; !6
+Imprt+Sg3:%^XYY2VY%>as K ; !7
: VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED ; !8

+Der/škueʹtted:%^PAL%^XYY2VY»škuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;

!! DERIVED VERBS WITH PENULTIMATE VOWEL LOSS AND CHANGE

!! !CLASS 2 HIGH VOWEL, NO PALATALIZATION
LEXICON V_AALǤTED !!= * @CODE@  aalǥted:aalǥât
+V: V0_AALǤTED ;
LEXICON IV_AALǤTED !!= * @CODE@  aalǥted:aalǥât
+V+IV: V0_AALǤTED ;
LEXICON TV_AALǤTED !!= * @CODE@  aalǥted:aalǥât
+V+TV: V0_AALǤTED ;
LEXICON V0_AALǤTED !!= * @CODE@  aalǥted:aalǥât
!! gradation: no
! lexicon ''@LEXNAME@''
:%^PenVow2a VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-SG3 ; ! aalǥat
: VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;        ! aalǥât
:%^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ;		 ! aalǥted

LEXICON V_KULSTED !!= * @CODE@ kulsted:kuulâst
+V: V0_KULSTED ;
LEXICON IV_KULSTED !!= * @CODE@ kulsted:kuulâst
+V+IV: V0_KULSTED ;
LEXICON TV_KULSTED !!= * @CODE@ kulsted:kuulâst
+V+TV: V0_KULSTED ;
LEXICON V0_KULSTED !!= * @CODE@ kulsted:kuulâst

:%^PenVow2a VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-SG3 ; ! kuulâst
: VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;        ! kuulâst
:%^Pen%^VV2V%^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ;           ! kulsted
+Use/NG:%^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ;           ! kuulsted

LEXICON V_AGSTED !!= * @CODE@ agsted:aaggâst
+V: V0_AGSTED ;
LEXICON IV_AGSTED !!= * @CODE@ agsted:aaggâst
+V+IV: V0_AGSTED ;
LEXICON TV_AGSTED !!= * @CODE@ agsted:aaggâst
+V+TV: V0_AGSTED ;
LEXICON V0_AGSTED !!= * @CODE@ agsted:aaggâst

:%^PenVow2a VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-SG3 ; ! aaggâst
: VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;        ! aaggâst
:%^Pen%^VV2V%^Pen%^CC2C%^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ;           ! agsted
+Use/NG:%^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ;           ! aaggsted


LEXICON V_MAINSTED !!= * @CODE@ mainsted:maainâst
+V: V0_MAINSTED ;
LEXICON IV_MAINSTED !!= * @CODE@ mainsted:maainâst
+V+IV: V0_MAINSTED ;
LEXICON TV_MAINSTED !!= * @CODE@ mainsted:maainâst
+V+TV: V0_MAINSTED ;
LEXICON V0_MAINSTED !!= * @CODE@ mainsted:maainâst

! inf: sted
! Ind.Prs.Sg3: -â-
! foot: 2syll
! 1.1 Inf in âd (vowel shift)
! diphthong: no
! vowel_shift: yes
! consonant_type: geminate-single
! gradation: yes3
! weak_grade: single
! strong_grade: geminate
! lexicon ''@LEXNAME@'' 
! mainsted:mainâst
! * Yaml: __V-mainsted__
:%^PenVow2a VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-SG3 ; ! maainast
: VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;        ! maainâst
:%^Pen%^VV2V%^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ;           ! mainsted
+Use/NG:%^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ;           ! maainsted

+Ind+Prt+Pl1+Use/NG:%^Pen%^V2VV%^RmVow%>in             K  ; !WG ! maainstin
+Ind+Prt+Pl1+Use/NG:%^Pen%^V2VV%^RmVow%>iim             K  ; !WG ! maainstiim
+Ind+Prt+Pl1+Use/NG:%^Pen%^V2VV%^RmVow%>iin             K  ; !WG ! maainstiin
+Ind+Prt+Pl1+Use/NG:%^RmVow%>in             K  ; ! ! mainstin
+Ind+Prt+Pl1+Use/NG:%^RmVow%>iim             K  ; !WG ! maainstiim
+Ind+Prt+Pl1+Use/NG:%^RmVow%>iin             K  ; !WG ! maainstiin
+Ind+Prt+Pl2+Use/NG:%^Pen%^V2VV%^RmVow%>iid             K  ; !WG ! mainstiid
+Ind+Prt+Pl2+Use/NG:%^RmVow%>iid             K  ; !WG ! mainstiid

+Actio:%^RmVow%>am K ; ! 2015-05-07 Is this necessary

LEXICON V_NUÕLSTED !!= * @CODE@ nuõlsted:nuõllâst
+V: V0_NUÕLSTED ;
LEXICON IV_NUÕLSTED !!= * @CODE@ nuõlsted:nuõllâst
+V+IV: V0_NUÕLSTED ;
LEXICON TV_NUÕLSTED !!= * @CODE@ nuõlsted:nuõllâst
+V+TV: V0_NUÕLSTED ;
