src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot
aalǥted:aalǥât V_AALǤTED ;
aaŋkrded:aaŋkârd V_AALǤTED ;
agsted:aaggâst V_AGSTED ;
caksted:caakkâst V_AGSTED ;
ceäʹlǩǩed:ceälkk V_CEÄʹLǨǨED ;
cuåkkted:cuåkkât V_AALǤTED ;
halsled:halsâl V_MAINSTED ;
haursted:haurâst V_MAINSTED ;
hiârvted:hiârvât V_AALǤTED ;
houkkted:houkkât V_AALǤTED ;
iiđted:iiđât V_AALǤTED ;
iskrded:iiskârd V_MAINSTED ;
iʹlmmted:iʹlmmât V_AALǤTED ;
jiõnsted:jiõnâst V_MAINSTED ;
jiõŋŋted:jiõŋŋât V_AALǤTED ;
juuǥǥted:juuǥǥât V_AALǤTED ;
juäʹtǩǩed:juätkk V_CEÄʹLǨǨED ;
jäʹhssed:jähss V_MÄʹHSSED ;
kagsted:kaaggâst V_AGSTED ;
kannted:kannât V_AALǤTED ;
karsted:kaarâst V_KULSTED ;
koudsted:kooudâst V_MAINSTED ;
koulsted:kooulâst V_MAINSTED ;
koǯsted:kooǯǯâst V_AGSTED ;
kruuggted:kruuggât V_AALǤTED ;
kueʹstted:kuestt V_CEÄʹLǨǨED ;
kulsted:kuulâst V_KULSTED ;
kuäʹrdded:kuärdd V_CEÄʹLǨǨED ;
kuåksted:kuåkkâst V_NUÕLSTED ;
kuåksted:kuåkâst V_AALǤTED ;
kuõlmsted:kuõlmâst V_MAINSTED ;
kuõskted:kuõskât V_AALǤTED ;
kuõđted:kuõđât V_AALǤTED ;
kõrcsted:kõrcâst V_MAINSTED ;
kõrsmed:kõrâsm V_MAINSTED ;
kõvšted:kõõvâšt V_KULSTED ;
kõõččted:kõõččât V_AALǤTED ;
laanjted:laanjât V_AALǤTED ;
laidsted:laidâst V_MAINSTED ;
leäʹdǧǧed:leädgg V_CEÄʹLǨǨED ;
leäʹmnned:leämnn V_CEÄʹLǨǨED ;
liksted:liikkâst V_AGSTED ;
liuǥsted:liiuǥâst V_MAINSTED ;
livvted:livvât V_AALǤTED ;
liâvted:liâvât V_AALǤTED ;
loŋŋted:loŋŋât V_AALǤTED ;
luäʹptted:luäptt V_CEÄʹLǨǨED ;
lâʹhtted:lâhtt V_MÄʹHSSED ;
låʹhtted:låhtt V_MÄʹHSSED ;
lõđsted:lõõđâst V_KULSTED ;
lõđsted:lõđâst V_MAINSTED ;
maaʹlʼjted:maaʹlʼjât V_AALǤTED ;
mainsted:maainâst V_MAINSTED ;
meäʹtted:meätt V_MEÄʹTTED ;
muäʹrdded:muärdd V_CEÄʹLǨǨED ;
muõlkkted:muõlkkât V_AALǤTED ;
mäʹhssed:mähss V_MÄʹHSSED ;
mõnsted:mõnâst V_MAINSTED ;
mõõnted:mõõnât V_AALǤTED ;
neäʹsǩǩed:neäskk V_CEÄʹLǨǨED ;
njaabbted:njaabbât V_AALǤTED ;
njabsted:njaabbâst V_AGSTED ;
njamsted:njamâst V_MAINSTED ;
njipčsted:njipčâst V_AALǤTED ;
njiõlsted:njiõlâst V_MAINSTED ;
njuõrsmed:njuõrâsm V_MAINSTED ;
noorted:noorât V_AALǤTED ;
nuõrsmed:nuõrâsm V_MAINSTED ;
obsted:oobbâst V_AGSTED ;
ooccšed:ooccâš V_AALǤTED ;
paaimted:paaimât V_AALǤTED ;
pagsted:paaggâst V_AGSTED ;
pancrded:paancârd V_MAINSTED ;
peäʹstted:peästt V_CEÄʹLǨǨED ;
peʹhtted:pehtt V_MÄʹHSSED ;
piiđted:piiđât V_AALǤTED ;
pirsted:piirâst V_KULSTED ;
piõggted:piõggât V_AALǤTED ;
piõrdsted:piõrdâst V_MAINSTED ;
ponjsted:poonjâst V_KULSTED ;
poorted:poorât V_AALǤTED ;
porjsted:porjâst V_AALǤTED ;
priiskted:priiskât V_AALǤTED ;
puäʹldded:puäldd V_CEÄʹLǨǨED ;
puʹtsted:puʹtâst V_MAINSTED ;
päʹhtted:pähtt V_MÄʹHSSED ;
raajted:raajât V_AALǤTED ;
rajsted:rajâst V_MAINSTED ;
ravsmed:raavâsm V_KULSTED ;
riõkkted:riõkkât V_AALǤTED ;
ruõnsmed:ruõnâsm V_MAINSTED ;
rõpsted:rõõppâst V_AGSTED ;
rõõppted:rõõppât V_AALǤTED ;
siivted:siivât V_AALǤTED ;
suuǥǥted:suuǥǥât V_AALǤTED ;
suäʹdǧǧed:suädgg V_CEÄʹLǨǨED ;
suäʹrdded:suärdd V_CEÄʹLǨǨED ;
såʹhtted:såhtt V_MÄʹHSSED ;
tabǯsted:taabǯâst V_MAINSTED ;
taibsted:taibâst V_MAINSTED ;
taksted:taakkâst V_AGSTED ;
talsted:taallâst V_AGSTED ;
tancsted:tancâst V_MAINSTED ;
terroriʹstted:terroristt V_CEÄʹLǨǨED ;
teäʹtted:teätt V_MEÄʹTTED ;
tiârted:tiârât V_AALǤTED ;
tovrded:toovârd V_KULSTED ;
tõrǥsmed:tõrǥâsm V_MAINSTED ;
určsted:uurčâst V_MAINSTED ;
uurčted:uurčât V_AALǤTED ;
vaaʒʒted:vaaʒʒât V_AALǤTED ;
valksted:valkâst V_MAINSTED ;
veäʹrǧǧed:veärgg V_CEÄʹLǨǨED ;
viggted:viggât V_AALǤTED ;
vipsted:viippâst V_AGSTED ;
virksmed:virkâsm V_MAINSTED ;
viârted:viârât V_AALǤTED ;
vuejsted:vuejast V_MAINSTED ;
vuäǥsäʹstted:vuäǥsästt V_CEÄʹLǨǨED ;
vuäʹstted:vuästt V_CEÄʹLǨǨED ;
vuõiŋsted:vuõiŋâst V_MAINSTED ;
vuõjted:vuõjât V_AALǤTED ;
vuõlsted:vuõlâst V_MAINSTED ;
vuõrsmed:vuõrâsm V_MAINSTED ;
vuõǥsmed:vuõǥǥâsm V_NUÕLSTED ;
äʹhtted:ähtt V_MÄʹHSSED ;
õõlǥted:õõlǥât V_AALǤTED ;
õʒsted:õʒâst V_MAINSTED ;
čiučsted:čiučâst V_MAINSTED ;
čiõpsted:čiõpâst V_MAINSTED ;
čiõrsted:čiõrâst V_MAINSTED ;
čiõǥrded:čiõǥǥârd V_NUÕLSTED ;
čoouǥted:čoouǥât V_AALǤTED ;
čuõmsted:čuõmâst V_MAINSTED ;
čuõppted:čuõppât V_AALǤTED ;
čuõrmsted:čuõrmâst V_MAINSTED ;
čõõnted:čõõnât V_AALǤTED ;
šeäʹštted:šeäštt V_CEÄʹLǨǨED ;
šluäʹŋǩǩed:šluäŋkk V_CEÄʹLǨǨED ;
šuõnsted:šuõnâst V_MAINSTED ;
šõlmsted:šõlmâst V_MAINSTED ;
ǩiõrǥted:ǩiõrǥât V_AALǤTED ;
